dictionaries/sn_ZW.aff
# sn_ZW.aff — Shona (Zimbabwe) Hunspell affix file
# Shona Digital Toolkit v0.1 (seed release)
# License: MIT — free for community and academic extension
#
# Shona is agglutinative: a verb stem like -tenda (thank/believe)
# surfaces as ndinotenda, unotenda, vanotenda, ndichatenda, ndakatenda...
# Rather than list every form, we generate them:
#   flag V  = verb stem: takes subject-concord + tense prefix complexes
#   flag N  = infinitive/class-15 "ku-" prefix (kutenda, kuona)
#   flag G  = negative prefix complexes (handitendi handled via REP for v0.1)
#
# v0.1 covers the most frequent SC+TAM combinations (present habitual -no-,
# future -cha-, recent past -a-, remote past -aka-, past habitual -ai-).
# Object infixes (-ku-, -mu-, -zvi-...) and verbal extensions are v0.2 work.

SET UTF-8
COMPLEXPREFIXES
TRY ainouderzhskmvtwbgpycfjl'

WORDCHARS '

# ---- suggestion improvements: common Shona typing errors ----
REP 12
REP l r
REP r l
REP nh n'
REP mw mv
REP ts tsv
REP z zv
REP s sv
REP shona Shona
REP c ch
REP dh d
REP bh b
REP vh v

MAP 2
MAP lr
MAP aá

# =====================================================================
# PFX V: subject concord + tense/aspect complexes attached to verb stems
# Stems are stored WITH final vowel (e.g. "tenda"), prefixes attach whole.
# SCs: ndi(1sg) u(2sg) a(3sg cl1) ti(1pl) mu(2pl) va(3pl/hon)
#      chi(cl7) zvi(cl8) ri(cl5) i(cl9) dzi(cl10) ku(cl15/17) pa(cl16) mu(cl18)
# TAMs: -no- habitual/present, -cha- future, -a- recent past,
#       -aka- remote past, -ai- past habitual, -nga- potential aux forms
# =====================================================================
PFX V Y 78
PFX V 0 ndino .
PFX V 0 ndicha .
PFX V 0 ndaka .
PFX V 0 ndai .
PFX V 0 ndi .
PFX V 0 nda .
PFX V 0 uno .
PFX V 0 ucha .
PFX V 0 waka .
PFX V 0 wai .
PFX V 0 wa .
PFX V 0 ano .
PFX V 0 acha .
PFX V 0 aka .
PFX V 0 ai .
PFX V 0 a .
PFX V 0 tino .
PFX V 0 ticha .
PFX V 0 taka .
PFX V 0 tai .
PFX V 0 ta .
PFX V 0 ti .
PFX V 0 muno .
PFX V 0 mucha .
PFX V 0 maka .
PFX V 0 mai .
PFX V 0 ma .
PFX V 0 mu .
PFX V 0 vano .
PFX V 0 vacha .
PFX V 0 vaka .
PFX V 0 vai .
PFX V 0 va .
PFX V 0 chino .
PFX V 0 chicha .
PFX V 0 chaka .
PFX V 0 chai .
PFX V 0 cha .
PFX V 0 chi .
PFX V 0 zvino .
PFX V 0 zvicha .
PFX V 0 zvaka .
PFX V 0 zvai .
PFX V 0 zva .
PFX V 0 zvi .
PFX V 0 rino .
PFX V 0 richa .
PFX V 0 raka .
PFX V 0 rai .
PFX V 0 ra .
PFX V 0 ri .
PFX V 0 ino .
PFX V 0 icha .
PFX V 0 yaka .
PFX V 0 yai .
PFX V 0 ya .
PFX V 0 dzino .
PFX V 0 dzicha .
PFX V 0 dzaka .
PFX V 0 dzai .
PFX V 0 dza .
PFX V 0 dzi .
PFX V 0 kuno .
PFX V 0 kucha .
PFX V 0 kwaka .
PFX V 0 kwai .
PFX V 0 kwa .
PFX V 0 pano .
PFX V 0 pacha .
PFX V 0 paka .
PFX V 0 pai .
PFX V 0 pa .
PFX V 0 handi .
PFX V 0 hau .
PFX V 0 haa .
PFX V 0 hati .
PFX V 0 hamu .
PFX V 0 hava .

# PFX N: infinitive / gerund ku- (class 15): kutenda, kuona, kudya
PFX N Y 2
PFX N 0 ku .
PFX N 0 kusa .

# PFX C: copulative/associative particles on nouns & pronouns
# na- (with/and, by), sa- (like), va- (honorific), mu- (in), pa- (at), ku- (to)
PFX C Y 8
PFX C 0 na .
PFX C 0 ne .
PFX C 0 no .
PFX C 0 sa .
PFX C 0 se .
PFX C 0 mu .
PFX C 0 pa .
PFX C 0 ku .

# SFX P: verb final-vowel alternation a->i for negatives (handitendi)
# applies to stems flagged P, replacing final a with i
SFX P Y 1
SFX P a i a

# PFX O: object concords (infixes, realised as inner prefixes): ndinoKUda
PFX O Y 15
PFX O 0 ndi/VN .
PFX O 0 ku/VN .
PFX O 0 mu/VN .
PFX O 0 ti/VN .
PFX O 0 va/VN .
PFX O 0 wa/VN .
PFX O 0 i/VN .
PFX O 0 ri/VN .
PFX O 0 chi/VN .
PFX O 0 zvi/VN .
PFX O 0 dzi/VN .
PFX O 0 ru/VN .
PFX O 0 ka/VN .
PFX O 0 hu/VN .
PFX O 0 pa/VN .

# SFX E: verbal extensions on -a stems
# applicative -ira/-era, causative -isa/-esa, passive -wa/-iwa,
# reciprocal -ana, neuter/stative -ika/-eka, causative+passive -iswa
SFX E Y 11
SFX E a ira a
SFX E a era a
SFX E a isa a
SFX E a esa a
SFX E a wa a
SFX E a iwa a
SFX E a ana a
SFX E a ika a
SFX E a eka a
SFX E a iswa a
SFX E a irwa a
