dictionaries/sn_ZW.dic
603
# Verb stems (V = conjugates with subject/tense prefixes; N = takes ku-; P = negative final vowel)
tenda/VNPOE
ona/VNPOE
ita/VNPOE
taura/VNPOE
enda/VNPOE
uya/VNPOE
dya/VNPOE
nwa/VNPOE
rara/VNPOE
shanda/VNPOE
tamba/VNPOE
imba/VNPOE
verenga/VNPOE
nyora/VNPOE
teerera/VNPOE
ziva/VNPOE
funga/VNPOE
batsira/VNPOE
tenga/VNPOE
tengesa/VNPOE
gara/VNPOE
mira/VNPOE
famba/VNPOE
mhanya/VNPOE
seka/VNPOE
chema/VNPOE
fara/VNPOE
suwa/VNPOE
kumbira/VNPOE
bvunza/VNPOE
pindura/VNPOE
dzidza/VNPOE
dzidzisa/VNPOE
bika/VNPOE
geza/VNPOE
chengeta/VNPOE
rega/VNPOE
tora/VNPOE
isa/VNPOE
bata/VNPOE
vhura/VNPOE
vhara/VNPOE
tsvaga/VNPOE
wana/VNPOE
kanganwa/VNPOE
rangarira/VNPOE
yeuka/VNPOE
da/VNPOE
venga/VNPOE
tya/VNPOE
vimba/VNPOE
namata/VNPOE
ridza/VNPOE
nzwa/VNPOE
udza/VNPOE
sunga/VNPOE
sunungura/VNPOE
simuka/VNPOE
gadzira/VNPOE
kwira/VNPOE
buruka/VNPOE
pinda/VNPOE
buda/VNPOE
svika/VNPOE
dzoka/VNPOE
siya/VNPOE
peta/VNPOE
sheedza/VNPOE
daidza/VNPOE
shevedza/VNPOE
tuma/VNPOE
tumira/VNPOE
pedza/VNPOE
tanga/VNPOE
enzanisa/VNPOE
sarudza/VNPOE
vaka/VNPOE
rima/VNPOE
sima/VNPOE
kohwa/VNPOE
cheka/VNPOE
tema/VNPOE
kuvadza/VNPOE
rapa/VNPOE
pora/VNPOE
fa/VNPOE
rarama/VNPOE
mutsa/VNPOE
muka/VNPOE
kotsira/VNPOE
zorora/VNPOE
mirira/VNPOE
tarisa/VNPOE
nyemwerera/VNPOE
tsamwa/VNPOE
kanganisa/VNPOE
ruza/VNPOE
hwina/VNPOE
kunda/VNPOE
edza/VNPOE
idza/VNPOE
simbisa/VNPOE
kurudzira/VNPOE
yambira/VNPOE
nyengetera/VNPOE
kumbirira/VNPOE
paridza/VNPOE
tsanangura/VNPOE
dudzira/VNPOE
shandura/VNPOE
shandisa/VNPOE
wedzera/VNPOE
derdza/VNPOE
bvisa/VNPOE
wisa/VNPOE
donha/VNPOE
rasa/VNPOE
rasika/VNPOE
tadza/VNPOE
gona/VNPOE
kwanisa/VNPOE
fanira/VNPOE
sungirwa/VNPOE
bvuma/VNPOE
ramba/VNPOE
nyara/VNPOE
zvidza/VNPOE
remekedza/VNPOE
kudza/VNPOE
rumbidza/VNPOE
tuka/VNPOE
rova/VNPOE
rwa/VNPOE
rwisa/VNPOE
dzivirira/VNPOE
ponesa/VNPOE
nunura/VNPOE
yamura/VNPOE
perekedza/VNPOE
tevera/VNPOE
tungamira/VNPOE
tungamirira/VNPOE
# Greetings & discourse
mhoro
mhoroi
makadii
maswera
mangwanani
masikati
manheru
ndeipi
kwaziwai
chisarai
fambai
zvakanaka
hongu
ehe
kwete
aiwa
ndapota
maita
basa
mazvita
tatenda
pamusoroi
ruregerero
sori
zvakadaro
saka
asi
uye
kana
nokuti
nekuti
zvino
ikozvino
manje
pakarepo
# Pronouns & demonstratives
ini/C
iwe/C
iye/C
isu/C
imi/C
ivo/C
uyu
uyo
ava
avo
ichi
icho
izvi
izvo
iri
iro
iyi
iyo
idzi
idzo
apa
apo
uku
ikoko
umu
imomo
ndini
ndiwe
ndiye
ndisu
ndimi
ndivo
# People & family (singular and plural listed explicitly)
munhu/C
vanhu/C
mwana/C
vana/C
murume/C
varume/C
mukadzi/C
vakadzi/C
baba/C
amai/C
mai/C
sekuru/C
ambuya/C
mbuya/C
mukoma/C
vakoma/C
munin'ina/C
vanin'ina/C
hanzvadzi/C
tete/C
babamukuru/C
babamunini/C
maiguru/C
mainini/C
muzukuru/C
vazukuru/C
shamwari/C
dzisahwira/C
sahwira/C
muvakidzani/C
vavakidzani/C
mudzidzisi/C
vadzidzisi/C
mudzidzi/C
vadzidzi/C
chiremba/C
murapi/C
murimi/C
varimi/C
mufundisi/C
vafundisi/C
mutungamiri/C
vatungamiri/C
mushandi/C
vashandi/C
muenzi/C
vaenzi/C
mutorwa/C
mwenga/C
chikomba/C
# Places & things
musha/C
misha/C
imba/C
dzimba/C
chikoro/C
zvikoro/C
chipatara/C
zvipatara/C
kereke/C
chechi/C
musika/C
misika/C
chitoro/C
zvitoro/C
guta/C
maguta/C
dhorobha/C
ruwa/C
nyika/C
dunhu/C
matunhu/C
munda/C
minda/C
bindu/C
mapindu/C
gomo/C
makomo/C
rwizi/C
nzizi/C
gungwa/C
sango/C
masango/C
nzira/C
mugwagwa/C
migwagwa/C
bhazi/C
mabhazi/C
motokari/C
chitima/C
zvitima/C
ndege/C
bhasikoro/C
# Food & household
sadza
mvura
moto
huni
chingwa
nyama
muriwo
miriwo
mbatatisi
chibage
zviyo
mupunga
munyu
shuga
tii
doro
hwahwa
mukaka
mazai
zai
derere
nyemba
nzungu
maputi
mango
banana
orenji
domasi
madomasi
hanyanisi
mbatata
poto
hari
ndiro
mugoti
banga
mapanga
chigero
tafura
matafura
chigaro
zvigaro
mubhedha
mibhedha
gonhi
makonhi
hwindo
mahwindo
denga
matenga
uriri
gumbeze
magumbeze
jira
machira
hembe
bhurugwa
rokwe
marokwe
shangu
bhutsu
ngowani
# Nature, animals, time
zuva
mazuva
mwedzi
gore
makore
svondo
vhiki
usiku
mambakwedza
manheruwo
mhepo
chando
kupisa
chirimo
zhizha
matsutso
chishanu
muvhuro
chipiri
chitatu
china
mugovera
imbwa
katsi
mombe
huku
hove
shiri
nyoka
shumba
nzou
mbada
bere
tsuro
gudo
soko
mhuka
dzimhuka
mhou
ngoma
mbudzi
hwai
nguruve
dhadha
njiva
gondo
zizi
nyuchi
nhunzi
# Body
musoro
misoro
maziso
ziso
nzeve
mhino
muromo
miromo
meno
zino
rurimi
huro
pfudzi
mapfudzi
ruoko
maoko
chanza
zvanza
munwe
minwe
dumbu
matumbu
gumbo
makumbo
tsoka
ibvi
mabvi
musana
moyo
mwoyo
ropa
ganda
vhudzi
ndebvu
# Abstract & common
mari
mabasa
zita
mazita
shoko
mashoko
nyaya
rudo
rufu
upenyu
hupenyu
utano
hutano
simba
masimba
ruzivo
uchenjeri
hungwaru
runyararo
rugare
dambudziko
matambudziko
mufaro
kufara
kusuwa
shungu
hasha
kutya
tariro
kutenda
chokwadi
nhema
manyepo
chivi
zvivi
ropafadzo
makomborero
chikomborero
mutemo
mitemo
murau
mirau
tsika
magariro
chinyakare
chivanhu
mutauro
mitauro
chishona
chirungu
bhuku
mabhuku
tsamba
matsamba
pepa
mapepa
chinyorwa
zvinyorwa
mubvunzo
mibvunzo
mhinduro
dzidziso
chidzidzo
zvidzidzo
bvunzo
ruzha
inzwi
manzwi
mumhanzi
rwiyo
nziyo
mutambo
mitambo
nhabvu
bhora
mabhora
firimu
mafirimu
mifananidzo
mufananidzo
foni
mafoni
runhare
kombiyuta
makombiyuta
terevhizheni
redhiyo
magetsi
getsi
# Numbers & quantity
potsi
piri
tatu
ina
shanu
tanhatu
nomwe
sere
pfumbamwe
gumi
makumi
zana
mazana
churu
zviuru
hafu
zvishoma
zvizhinji
zvose
zvese
ose
ese
oga
ega
chete
zvakare
futi
kamwe
kaviri
katatu
# Question words & adverbs
ani
chii
sei
seiko
riini
rinhi
kupi
ngani
zvakadii
nhasi
mangwana
nezuro
madeko
kare
karekare
gare
pashure
mushure
mberi
shure
pamberi
pasi
pamusoro
mukati
kunze
padyo
pedyo
kure
ipapo
uko
kumusha
kumba
zvakanyanya
nyatso
chaizvo
chose
kwazvo
zvikuru
